New York, session 2025-2026, A6455.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 530.15 to read as follows: 3 § 530.15 Temporary order of protection hearing. 4 Where a court has issued a temporary order of protection pursuant to 5 subdivision one of section 530.12 of this article or subdivision one of 6 section 530.13 of this article, upon application of a defendant, the 7 court shall hold an evidentiary hearing where the prosecutor must show, 8 by an articulated reasonable basis, that the temporary order of 9 protection is likely to achieve its purpose in the absence of such a 10 condition, of protecting a designated witness or complainant from intim- 11 idation or injury. 12 (a) The defendant shall be entitled to such hearing within five busi- 13 ness days of requesting such hearing. Notice must be given by the court 14 to both parties, as well as the party protected by the order of 15 protection, in advance of the hearing. Such notice shall detail the 16 rights of the protected party with respect to the hearing and describe 17 the different types of temporary orders of protection available. 18 (b) At the hearing, the prosecution must present relevant witness 19 testimony, subject to cross-examination. The witness need not be the 20 party protected by the order. Hearsay and relevant evidence is admissi- 21 ble, but shall be introduced through a witness. 22 (c) The court shall state on the record or in writing its findings of 23 facts and conclusions of law, the reasons for maintaining, vacating, or 24 modifying the temporary order of protection, and, where applicable, why 25 the temporary order of protection is necessary to achieve its purpose in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03134-03-5 A. 6455 2 1 the absence of such a condition, of protecting a designated witness or 2 complainant from intimidation or injury. 3 § 2. Section 530.30 of the criminal procedure law, the section heading 4 and subdivisions 1 and 2 as amended by section 17 of part JJJ of chapter 5 59 of the laws of 2019, the closing paragraph of subdivision 1 as 6 amended by section 7 of subpart A of part VV of chapter 56 of the laws 7 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 8 § 530.30 Order of recognizance, release under non-monetary conditions or 9 bail or issuance of a temporary order of protection; by supe- 10 rior court judge when action is pending in local criminal 11 court. 12 1. When a criminal action is pending in a local criminal court, other 13 than one consisting of a superior court judge sitting as such, a judge 14 of a superior court holding a term thereof in the county, upon applica- 15 tion of a defendant, may order recognizance, release under non-monetary 16 conditions or, where authorized, bail when such local criminal court: 17 (a) Lacks authority to issue such an order, pursuant to the relevant 18 provisions of section 530.20 of this article; or 19 (b) Has denied an application for recognizance, release under non-mon- 20 etary conditions or bail; or 21 (c) Has fixed bail, where authorized, which is excessive; or 22 (d) Has set a securing order of release under non-monetary conditions 23 which are more restrictive than necessary to reasonably assure the 24 defendant's return to court. 25 In such case, such superior court judge may vacate the order of such 26 local criminal court and release the defendant on recognizance or under 27 non-monetary conditions, or where authorized, fix bail in a lesser 28 amount or in a less burdensome form, or order non-monetary conditions in 29 conjunction with fixing bail, including fixing bail in a lesser amount 30 or in a less burdensome form, the determination for which shall be made 31 in accordance with section 510.10 of this title. The court shall explain 32 the basis for its determination and choice of securing order on the 33 record or in writing. 34 2. When a criminal action is pending in a local criminal court, other 35 than one consisting of a superior court judge sitting as such, and the 36 local criminal court has denied a request to modify or limit a temporary 37 order of protection issued pursuant to subdivision one of section 530.12 38 of this article or subdivision one of section 530.13 of this article, 39 upon application of a defendant, a judge of the superior court holding a 40 term thereof in the county shall review the determination of the local 41 criminal court de novo and may vacate or modify the order of the local 42 criminal court. A court's failure to comply with the requirements of 43 section 530.15 of this article is reviewable under this section. 44 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one or two of this 45 section, when the defendant is charged with a felony in a local criminal 46 court, a superior court judge may not order recognizance, release under 47 non-monetary conditions or, where authorized, bail, or vacate or modify 48 a temporary order of protection unless and until the district attorney 49 has had an opportunity to be heard in the matter and such judge and 50 counsel for the defendant have been furnished with a report as described 51 in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision two of section 52 530.20 of this article. 53 [3.] 4. Not more than one application may be made pursuant to each 54 subdivision of this section. 55 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.